Washington statutes.
RCW 16.04.070

Surplus—Disposition.

If when such animals are sold, there remains a surplus of money, over the amount of the judgment and costs, it shall be deposited with the county treasurer, by the officer making the sale, and if the owner of such animals does not appear and call for the same, within six months from the day of sale, it shall be paid into the school fund, for the use of the public schools of said county.

[ 1893 c 31 s 8; RRS s 3097.]